Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1556.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XVII-L of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subarticle to read:SUBARTICLE E.3ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING PROJECTSection 1790-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle 12345678910111213141516171819202122 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advanced clean manufacturing project facility." A facility located in this Commonwealth that is owned and operated by a qualified taxpayer and where clean steel, clean aluminum, clean cement, clean glass, CLEAN IRON, electric grid modernization equipment, energy-efficient heat pumps, energy-efficient turbines or hydrogen electrolyzers are produced."ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDIT" OR "CREDIT." A TAX CREDIT FOR WHICH THE DEPARTMENT HAS EXECUTED AN ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDIT COMMITMENT LETTER UNDER SECTION 1790.5-L."CLEAN IRON." IRON PRODUCED USING METHODS THAT REDUCE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS BY AT LEAST 75% COMPARED TO STANDARD FOSSIL-BASED PRODUCTION METHODS."Clean steel, clean aluminum, clean cement or clean glass." Steel produced WITHOUT COAL OR FOSSIL-FUEL-BASED IRON INPUTS using recycled scrap or direct reduced iron, or aluminum produced using recycled aluminum or inert anodes, or cement produced using low-carbon precursors OR WITH A CLINKER-TO-CEMENT RATIO UNDER 0.67 , or glass produced using recycled glass, which is also produced using energy from:(1) e lectric arc furnaces or other thermal energy generation or storage systems powered by electricity derived from renewable sources, AT LEAST 50% RENEWABLE SOURCES BY THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS DEFINITION AND 100% RENEWABLE SOURCES BY 2035, THROUGH A POWER PURCHASE AGREEMENT OR ONSITE GENERATION, including any type or category of facility in Table 1 of Revenue Procedure 2025-14 published by the Internal Revenue Service in 2025-7 Internal Revenue Bulletin 20250HB1556PN2625 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 770-771 or any successor table published in the Internal Revenue Bulletin, or a source defined as a Tier I alternative energy source under the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, or any source defined similarly under a successor standard;(2) hydrogen produced through a process IN DIRECT REDUCED IRON OR NOVEL REDUCTION FACILITIES that results in a life cycle greenhouse gas emissions rate of less than 4 kilograms of CO2e per kilogram of hydrogen, as described under 26 CFR 1.45V-1(a)(13) (relating to credit for production of clean hydrogen); or(3) any other production process such that the carbon dioxide emissions generated during the process of producing steel is at least 75% below the national industry average, as determined by the secretary. PRODUCTION PROCESS IS NO GREATER THAN THE 25TH PERCENTILE FOR THE INDUSTRY NATIONALLY, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION. "Credit." The qualified advanced clean manufacturing tax credit established under this subarticle."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH."DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION." THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."Electric grid modernization equipment." The term includes:(1) Distribution transformers, as defined under 42 U.S.C. § 6291(35) (relating to definitions).(2) Batteries, including thermal batteries, battery 20250HB1556PN2625 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 energy storage systems, fuel cells or any technology defined as "energy storage technology" in 26 U.S.C. § 48E(c)(2) (relating to clean electricity investment credit), including 26 CFR 1.48E-2(g)(6) (relating to qualified investments in qualified facilities and EST for purposes of section 48E).(3) ELECTRICAL STEEL."ELECTRICAL STEEL." SPECIALTY STEEL SUITABLE FOR SPECIALIZED USES IN THE CORES OF ELECTROMAGNETIC DEVICES, DISTRIBUTION TRANSFORMERS OR ELECTRIC GENERATORS, DUE TO ITS MAGNETIC PROPERTIES. THE TERM SHALL INCLUDE AMORPHOUS STEEL."Energy-efficient heat pumps." Any electric or natural gas heat pump which meets or exceeds the highest efficiency tier, not including any advanced tier, established by the Consortium for Energy Efficiency which is in effect as of the beginning of the calendar year in which the qualified advanced clean manufacturing project commences construction."Energy-efficient turbines." A turbine designed for use in a combined-cycle power plant and capable of achieving a combined-cycle efficiency of at least 65%, or a turbine designed for use in a hydroelectric facility and capable of achieving an efficiency of at least 90% , USING ANY COMMONLY ACCEPTED INDUSTRY MEASUREMENT OF TURBINE EFFICIENCY . "Hydrogen electrolyzer." An industrial, commercial or utility-scale device, apparatus or system that produces gaseous hydrogen by performing electrolysis."PASS-THROUGH ENTITY." A PARTNERSHIP AS DEFINED IN SECTION 301(N.0) OR A PENNSYLVANIA S CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 301(N.1)."PHASE CHANGE MATERIAL CEILING TILE." A CEILING TILE OR PANEL DESIGNED FOR USE IN BUILDING INTERIORS THAT INCORPORATES 20250HB1556PN2625 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ONE OR MORE PHASE CHANGE MATERIALS INTENDED TO ABSORB, STORE AND RELEASE THERMAL ENERGY AS THE MATERIAL CHANGES PHASE BETWEEN SOLID AND LIQUID OR OTHER PHYSICAL STATES, FOR THE PURPOSE OF MODERATING INDOOR TEMPERATURE FLUCTUATIONS AND IMPROVING ENERGY EFFICIENCY."Qualified advanced clean manufacturing project." PROJECT" OR "PROJECT." A project FOR WHICH A COMMITMENT LETTER HAS BEEN EXECUTED UNDER SECTION 1790.5-L, which either: (1) Re-equips, expands or establishes an industrial or manufacturing facility for the production of:(i) clean steel, clean aluminum, clean cement or clean glass;(ii) electric grid modernization equipment; or (iii) energy-efficient heat pumps, energy-efficient turbines or hydrogen electrolyzers . ; (IV) CLEAN IRON; OR(V) PHASE CHANGE MATERIAL CEILING TILES.(2) Otherwise re-equips an industrial or manufacturing facility for the production of clean steel, clean aluminum, clean cement or , clean glass OR CLEAN IRON, with equipment designed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions at the facility by at least 75% 50% . "Qualified production costs." Expenditures made by a qualified taxpayer that are directly attributable to the production of clean steel, clean aluminum, clean cement, clean glass, CLEAN IRON, electric grid modernization equipment, energy-efficient heat pumps, energy-efficient turbines or hydrogen electrolyzers, OR DIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE PRODUCTION OF CLEAN STEEL, CLEAN ALUMINUM, CLEAN CEMENT, CLEAN GLASS OR CLEAN IRON, AT A FACILITY RE-EQUIPPED WITH EQUIPMENT 20250HB1556PN2625 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DESIGNED TO REDUCE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AT THE FACILITY BY AT LEAST 50%, including, but not limited to, capital investment, operating costs, labor and raw materials, tangible property used as an integral part of the qualified advanced clean manufacturing project facility or any other tangible property necessary for re-equipping, expanding or establishing a qualified advanced clean manufacturing project faci lity. The term includes a pilot or commercial demonstration project's start-up expenditures under 26 U.S.C. § 195 (relating to start- up expenditures) and costs, including operational costs, associated with the construction, fabrication or building of a PILOT OR pre-commercial production line. "QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY." A TAX OWED BY A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER UNDER ARTICLE III, IV, VII, VIII OR XV, EXCLUDING ANY TAX WITHHELD BY AN EMPLOYER UNDER ARTICLE III."Qualified taxpayer." An entity subject to tax under Article III, IV or VI , VII, VIII OR XV that owns or operates a qualified advanced clean manufacturing project facility located in this Commonwealth. THE TERM INCLUDES A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY. "Secretary." The Secretary of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth.Section 1790.1-L. Qualified advanced clean manufacturing tax credit.For purposes of this subarticle, the qualified advanced clean manufacturing tax credit for any taxable year shall be an amount equal to 30% of the qualified production costs for the taxable year with respect to any qualified advanced clean manufacturing project of the taxpayer.Section 1790.2-L. Tax credit authorized.A qualified taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the 20250HB1556PN2625 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tax imposed under Article III, IV or VI QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY for qualified production costs incurred in a taxable year. A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY APPLY THE ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDIT TO NOT MORE THAN 20% OF THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY.Section 1790.3-L. Credit amount.The credit shall be equal to 30% of a qualified taxpayer's qualified production costs, not to exceed $10,000,000 $5,000,000 per taxable year.Section 1790.4-L. Qualified advanced clean manufacturing tax credit program.(a) Program.--Not later than 180 days after the effective date of this section, the secretary DEPARTMENT , in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development and the department DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION , shall establish a qualified advanced clean manufacturing tax credit program to consider and award certifications of credit APPROVE COMMITMENT LETTERS for qualified production costs eligible for credits under this subarticle to qualified taxpayers. The secretary DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION shall, not later than 120 days following the effective date of this section, set procedures for calculating and verifying greenhouse gas emission reductions of a qualified advanced clean manufacturing project . FOR THE PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THAT A QUALIFIED PROJECT FACILITY HAS RE-EQUIPPED AN INDUSTRIAL OR MANUFACTURING FACILITY FOR THE PRODUCTION OF CLEAN STEEL, CLEAN ALUMINUM, CLEAN CEMENT, CLEAN GLASS OR CLEAN IRON, WITH EQUIPMENT DESIGNED TO REDUCE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AT THE FACILITY BY AT LEAST 50%.(b) Application.--The application for a credit under this 20250HB1556PN2625 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subarticle shall include documentation verifying the taxpayer's status as a qualified taxpayer and the amount of qualified production costs incurred.(B) APPLICATION.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AN APPLICATION FOR A COMMITMENT LETTER UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE TO BE POSTED ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE. THE APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE DOCUMENTATION VERIFYING THE APPLICANT'S ELIGIBILITY TO BECOME A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER AND THE AMOUNT OF QUALIFIED PRODUCTION COSTS TO BE INCLUDED, AS WELL AS SUCH OTHER INFORMATION AS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE DEPARTMENT TO ESTABLISH APPROVAL CRITERIA FOR A COMMITMENT LETTER.(c) Annual cap.--The total amount of tax credits awarded under this subarticle shall not exceed $50,000,000 $25,000,000 in any fiscal year.(D) ADDITIONAL PROGRAM.--IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT CREDITS UNDER THIS SECTION ARE AVAILABLE FOR REDISTRIBUTION UNDER SECTION 1790.8-L, THE DEPARTMENT MAY AUTHORIZE AN ADDITIONAL APPLICATION PERIOD FOR COMMITMENT LETTERS FOR THE ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDIT.Section 1790.5-L. Certification.(a) Application period.--Each applicant for certification under this section shall submit an application containing information the secretary may require during the two-year period beginning on the date the secretary establishes the program under section 1790.4-L(a).(b) Deadline for certification.--Each applicant for certification shall have one year from the date of acceptance by the secretary of the application to provide to the secretary evidence that the requirements of the certification have been met.20250HB1556PN2625 - 8 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Period of issuance.--An applicant which receives a certification shall have three years from the date of issuance of the certification to place the project in service. If the project is not placed in service by the end of the time period, the certification shall no longer be valid.(d) Criteria.--In determining which qualified advanced clean manufacturing projects to certify under this section, the secretary shall take into consideration only the projects that have a reasonable expectation of commercial viability and:(1) will provide the greatest direct and indirect job creation within the Commonwealth during the credit period;(2) will provide the greatest net impact in avoiding or reducing air pollutants or anthropogenic emissions of greenhouse gases;(3) have the greatest potential for technological innovation and commercial deployment;(4) have the lowest levelized cost of generated or stored energy, or of measured reduction in energy consumption or greenhouse gas emissions based on costs of the full supply chain; and(5) have the shortest project time from certification to completion.Section 1790.6-L. Carry forward.If a qualified taxpayer does not utilize the entire amount of the credit in the year in which it is approved, the unused portion may be carried forward for a period not to exceed five taxable years.SECTION 1790.5-L. CERTIFICATION.(A) APPLICATION PERIOD.--AN APPLICANT FOR A COMMITMENT LETTER UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE MUST SUBMIT AN APPLICATION 20250HB1556PN2625 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONTAINING INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION. IF THE DEPARTMENT APPROVES THE TAXPAYER'S APPLICATION FOR A COMMITMENT LETTER, THE DEPARTMENT AND THE TAXPAYER SHALL EXECUTE A COMMITMENT LETTER CONTAINING THE FOLLOWING:(1) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE PROJECT.(2) THE MINIMUM NUMBER OF JOBS ANTICIPATED TO BE CREATED AT THE PROJECT SITE OR SITES.(3) THE LOCATION OF ALL PROJECT SITES.(4) THE PERIOD IN WHICH THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MUST PLACE THE PROJECT INTO SERVICE AND SUBMIT EVIDENCE OF QUALIFIED PRODUCTION COSTS FOR THE ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDIT. THE PERIOD MAY NOT EXCEED FOUR YEARS FROM THE DATE THE COMMITMENT LETTER IS EXECUTED. IF THE PROJECT IS NOT PLACED INTO SERVICE BY THE PERIOD SPECIFIED IN THE COMMITMENT LETTER, THE COMMITMENT LETTER SHALL BE RENDERED INVALID.(5) A REQUIREMENT TO MAINTAIN TAX COMPLIANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT.(6) THE PROJECTED AMOUNT OF QUALIFIED PRODUCTION COSTS THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER EXPECTS TO INCUR.(7) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT DEEMS NECESSARY.(B) CRITERIA.--IN DETERMINING WHICH APPLICANTS TO APPROVE FOR A COMMITMENT LETTER UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TAKE INTO CONSIDERATION ONLY THE PROJECTS THAT:(1) HAVE A REASONABLE EXPECTATION OF COMMERCIAL VIABILITY.(2) WILL PROVIDE THE GREATEST DIRECT AND INDIRECT JOB 20250HB1556PN2625 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CREATION WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH DURING THE CREDIT PERIOD.(3) WILL PROVIDE THE GREATEST NET IMPACT IN AVOIDING OR REDUCING AIR POLLUTANTS OR ANTHROPOGENIC EMISSIONS OF GREENHOUSE GASES.(4) HAVE THE GREATEST POTENTIAL FOR TECHNOLOGICAL INNOVATION AND COMMERCIAL DEPLOYMENT.(5) HAVE THE LOWEST LEVELIZED COST OF GENERATED OR STORED ENERGY OR OF MEASURED REDUCTION IN ENERGY CONSUMPTION OR GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS BASED ON COSTS OF THE FULL SUPPLY CHAIN.(6) HAVE THE SHORTEST PROJECT TIME FROM CERTIFICATION TO COMPLETION.(C) EFFECT OF COMMITMENT LETT ER.--UPON EXECUTION OF THE COMMITMENT LETTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RESERVE ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDITS FOR THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER. THE COMMITMENT LETTER SHALL DOCUMENT THE AVAILABILITY OF ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDITS FOR THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER PENDING THE PROJECT'S PLACEMENT INTO SERVICE, THE PROJECT'S ADHERENCE TO THE TERMS OF THE COMMITMENT LETTER AND THE DEPARTMENT'S REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF QUALIFIED PRODUCTION COSTS.(D) ISSUANCE OF CREDIT.--AFTER PLACING THE PROJECT INTO SERVICE, THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER SHALL PRESENT EVIDENCE OF QUALIFIED PRODUCTION COSTS TO THE DEPARTMENT. UPON REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF THE EVIDENCE PRESENTED BY THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING CREDITS.SECTION 1790.5A-L. PASS-THROUGH ENTITY.(A) ELECTION.--IF A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY HAS ANY UNUSED CREDITS UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE, THE ENTITY MAY ELECT IN WRITING, ACCORDING TO PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT, TO 20250HB1556PN2625 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TRANSFER ALL OR A PORTION OF THE CREDIT TO SHAREHOLDERS, MEMBERS OR PARTNERS IN PROPORTION OR THE SHARE OF THE ENTITY'S DISTRIBUTIVE INCOME TO WHICH THE SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER IS ENTITLED.(B) PROHIBITION.--A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY AND A SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER OF A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY MAY NOT CLAIM THE CREDIT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) FOR THE SAME NEW PROJECT.(C) WHEN CREDIT TO BE CLAIMED.--A SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER OF A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY TO WHOM A CREDIT IS TRANSFERRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL IMMEDIATELY CLAIM THE CREDIT IN THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE TRANSFER IS MADE. THE SHAREHOLDER, MEMBER OR PARTNER MAY NOT CARRY FORWARD, CARRY BACK OR OBTAIN A REFUND OF THE CREDIT.SECTION 1790.6-L. CARRY FORWARD, SALE OR ASSIGNMENT.(A) PERMISSABLE CARRY FORWARD.--(1) IF THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER CANNOT USE THE ENTIRE AMOUNT OF ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDITS FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDITS ARE FIRST APPROVED, THE EXCESS MAY BE CARRIED OVER TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS AND USED AS A CREDIT AGAINST THE QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY FOR THE SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS.(2) EACH TIME THE ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDIT IS CARRIED OVER TO A SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEAR, THE ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDIT SHALL BE REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT OF THE ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDIT USED DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING TAXABLE YEAR.(3) THE ADVANCED CLEAN MANUFACTURING TAX CREDIT MAY BE CARRIED OVER AND APPLIED TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS FOR NO MORE THAN FIVE TAXABLE YEARS FOLLOWING THE FIRST TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER WAS ENTITLED TO CLAIM THE 20250HB1556PN2625 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CREDIT.(B) SELLER AND ASSIGNOR PROVISIONS.--IN THE CASE OF SALE OR ASSIGNMENT, THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO THE SELLER OR ASSIGNOR:(1) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER, UPON APPLICATION TO AND APPROVAL BY THE DEPARTMENT, MAY SELL OR ASSIGN, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, A CREDIT GRANTED TO THE TAXPAYER UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE.(2) BEFORE AN APPLICATION IS APPROVED, THE DEPARTMENT MUST MAKE A FINDING THAT THE APPLICANT HAS FILED ALL REQUIRED STATE TAX REPORTS AND RETURNS FOR ALL APPLICABLE TAXABLE YEARS AND PAID ANY BALANCE OF STATE TAX DUE AS DETERMINED AT SETTLEMENT, ASSESSMENT OR DETERMINATION BY THE DEPARTMENT.(3) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SETTLE, ASSESS OR DETERMINE THE TAX OF AN APPLICANT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION NO LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER FILING OF ALL REQUIRED FINAL RETURNS OR REPORTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 806.1(A)(5) OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS THE FISCAL CODE . (C) PURCHASER AND ASSIGNEE PROVISIONS.--IN THE CASE OF SALE AND ASSIGNMENT, THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO THE PURCHASER OR ASSIGNEE:(1) THE PURCHASER OR ASSIGNEE OF ALL OR A PORTION OF A CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE SHALL IMMEDIATELY CLAIM THE CREDIT IN THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE PURCHASE OR ASSIGNMENT IS MADE.(2) THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT THAT A PURCHASER OR ASSIGNEE MAY USE AGAINST ANY ONE QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY MAY NOT EXCEED 20% OF SUCH QUALIFIED TAX LIABILITY FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR.(3) THE PURCHASER OR ASSIGNEE MAY NOT CARRY FORWARD, 20250HB1556PN2625 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CARRY BACK OR OBTAIN A REFUND OF OR SELL OR ASSIGN THE CREDIT.Section 1790.7-L. Recapture.If the department , IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, determines that a qualified taxpayer has received the credit through fraud or misrepresentation, or has failed to maintain APPLICABLE clean steel, clean aluminum, clean cement or clean glass production standards OR CLEAN IRON PRODUCTION STANDARDS, for two consecutive taxable years, the credit shall be subject to recapture, along with applicable interest and penalties.Section 1790.8-L. Redistribution.The secretary DEPARTMENT may reallocate credits awarded under this section if the secretary DEPARTMENT determines that: (1) there is an insufficient quantity of pending qualifying applications for certification COMMITMENT LETTERS under section 1790.5-L at the time of the review;(2) any certification made COMMITMENT LETTER EXECUTED under section 1790.5-L has been revoked under this subarticle because the project subject to the certification has been delayed as a result of third-party opposition or litigation to the proposed project; or(3) the credit has been recaptured under section 1790.7-L.Section 1790.9-L. Public disclosure.The secretary DEPARTMENT shall, upon making a certification under this section, publicly disclose the identity of an applicant under section 1790.5-L and the amount of the credit with respect to the applicant.Section 1790.10-L. Expiration.20250HB1556PN2625 - 14 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No credits shall be approved under this subarticle for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2035, unless reauthorized by the General Assembly.Section 2. Section 1791-L of the act is amended to read:Section 1791-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Qualified project facility." Any of the following:(1) A project facility as defined in section 1711-L.(2) A project facility as defined in section 1731-L.(3) A project facility as defined in section 1751-L.(4) A project facility as defined in section 1771-L.(5) An advanced clean manufacturing project facility as defined in section 1790-L."Qualified tax credit recipient." Any of the following who have been awarded a tax credit:(1) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1711-L.(2) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1731-L.(3) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1751-L.(4) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1771-L.(5) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1790-L.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1556PN2625 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223